Louisiana, session 2026, HB12.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1665.2(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
SUBPART A-1. PAYMENT TO SURVIVING SPOUSE
AND CHILDREN
§1665.2. Financial security for surviving spouses and children of law enforcement
officers in certain cases
* * *
F. In addition to the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, the surviving
spouse or child of a law enforcement officer who is a commissioned law
enforcement officer and who is certified by the Council on Peace Officers Officer
Standards and Training or is a reserve or auxiliary law enforcement officer at the
time of his death shall be entitled to the payments provided for in Paragraph (C)(1)
of this Section, if either of the following occur:
(1) The officer was traveling to or from a public safety emergency or was
responding to a request for law enforcement assistance regarding the health, safety,
or welfare of the public.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 12 ENROLLED
(2) The officer was traveling to or from his residence and his authorized
work area while using a law enforcement vehicle provided by his employing agency.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.